Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1333.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Equal Employment for All Act.Section 2. Prohibition.An employer or potential employer may not procure a consumer report or investigative consumer report, or cause a consumer report or investigative consumer report to be procured, for purposes of employment or making an adverse employment action if any information contained in the report bears on the employee's or potential employee's creditworthiness, credit standing or credit capacity, unless any of the following apply:(1) The consumer applies for or currently holds employment that requires national security or Commonwealth 1234567891011121314151617 security or Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation clearance.(2) The consumer applies for or currently holds employment with the Commonwealth or a local government agency which otherwise requires use of a consumer report.(3) The consumer applies for or currently holds a supervisory, managerial or executive position at a financial institution.(4) The information is required by law.Section 3. Enforcement.A violation of section 2 shall constitute an unlawful discriminatory practice for purposes of section 5 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, and shall be subject to enforcement as provided under that act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1333PN1739 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516